California statutes. Vehicle Code
(f) If the peace officer serves the notice of the order of suspension or revocation of the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle, the peace officer shall take possession of all driver’s licenses issued by this state that are held by the person. The temporary driver’s license shall be an endorsement on the notice of the order of suspension and shall be
 valid for 30 days from the date of arrest.

(g) (1) The peace officer shall immediately forward a copy of the completed notice of suspension or revocation form and any driver’s license taken into possession under subdivision (f), with the report required by Section 13380, to the department. If the person submitted to a blood or urine test, the peace officer shall forward the results immediately to the appropriate forensic laboratory. The forensic laboratory shall forward the results of the chemical tests to the department within 15 calendar days of the date of the arrest.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, a document containing data prepared and maintained in the governmental forensic laboratory computerized database system that is electronically transmitted or retrieved through public or private computer networks to or by the
 department is the best available evidence of the chemical test results in all administrative proceedings conducted by the department. In addition, any other official record that is maintained in the governmental forensic laboratory, relates to a chemical test analysis prepared and maintained in the governmental forensic laboratory computerized database system, and is electronically transmitted and retrieved through a public or private computer network to or by the department is admissible as evidence in the department’s administrative proceedings. In order to be admissible as evidence in administrative proceedings, a document described in this subparagraph shall bear a certification by the employee of the department who retrieved the document certifying that the information was received or retrieved directly from the computerized database system of a governmental forensic laboratory and that the document accurately reflects the data received or retrieved.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, the failure of an employee of the department to certify under subparagraph (A) is not a public offense.

(h) A preliminary alcohol screening test that indicates the presence or concentration of alcohol based on a breath sample in order to establish reasonable cause to believe the person was driving a vehicle in violation of Section 23140, 23152, or 23153 is a field sobriety test and may be used by an officer as a further investigative tool.

(i) If the officer decides to use a preliminary alcohol screening test, the officer shall advise the person that he or she is requesting that person to take a preliminary alcohol screening test to assist the officer in determining if that person is under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or a combination of alcohol and drugs. The person’s obligation to submit to a blood, breath, or urine test, as
 required by this section, for the purpose of determining the alcohol or drug content of that person’s blood, is not satisfied by the person submitting to a preliminary alcohol screening test. The officer shall advise the person of that fact and of the person’s right to refuse to take the preliminary alcohol screening test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 177, Sec. 3.   (AB 2717)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23614.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 23612, a person who chooses to submit to a breath test shall be advised before or after the test that the breath-testing equipment does not retain any sample of the breath and that no breath sample will be available after the test which could be analyzed later by that person or any other person.

(b) The person shall also be advised that, because no breath sample is
 retained, the person will be given an opportunity to provide a blood or urine sample that will be retained at no cost to the person so that there will be something retained that may be subsequently analyzed for the alcoholic content of the person’s blood. If the person completes a breath test and wishes to provide a blood or urine sample to be retained, the sample shall be collected and retained in the same manner as if the person had chosen a blood or urine test initially.

(c) The person shall also be advised that the blood or urine sample may be tested by either party in any criminal prosecution. The failure of either party to perform this test shall place neither a duty upon the opposing party to perform the test nor affect the admissibility of any other evidence of the alcoholic content of the blood of the person arrested.

(d) No failure or omission to advise pursuant to this
 section shall affect the admissibility of any evidence of the alcoholic content of the blood of the person arrested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Prior and Separate Offenses [23620. - 23626.]

23620.

(a) For the purposes of this division, Section 13352, and Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 23100) of Division 11, a separate offense that resulted in a conviction of a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 655 of the Harbors and Navigation Code or of Section 191.5 of, or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of, the Penal Code is a separate offense of a violation of Section 23153.

(b) For the purposes of this division and Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 23100) of
 Division 11, and Section 13352, a separate offense that resulted in a conviction of a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e) of Section 655 of the Harbors and Navigation Code is a separate violation of Section 23152.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 747, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

23622.

(a) In any case charging a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 and the offense occurred within 10 years of one or more separate violations of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, that occurred on or after January 1, 1982, 23152, or 23153, or any combination thereof, that resulted in convictions, the court shall not strike any separate conviction of those offenses for purposes of sentencing in order to avoid imposing, as part of the sentence or term of probation, the minimum time of imprisonment and the minimum fine, as provided
 in this chapter, or for purposes of avoiding revocation, suspension, or restriction of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle, as provided in this code.

(b) In any case charging a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, the court shall obtain a copy of the driving record of the person charged from the Department of Motor Vehicles and may obtain any records from the Department of Justice or any other source to determine if one or more separate violations of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, that occurred on or after January 1, 1982, 23152, or 23153, or any combination thereof, that resulted in convictions, have occurred within 10 years of the charged offense. The court may obtain, and accept as rebuttable evidence, a printout from the Department of Motor Vehicles of the driving record of the person charged, maintained by electronic and storage media pursuant to Section 1801 for the purpose of proving those separate violations.

(c) If any separate convictions of violations of Section 23152 or 23153 are reported to have occurred within 10 years of the charged offense, the court shall notify each court where any of the separate convictions occurred for the purpose of enforcing terms and conditions of probation pursuant to Section 23602.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 550, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

23624.

Only one challenge shall be permitted to the constitutionality of a separate conviction of a violation of Section 14601, 14601.2, 23152, or 23153, which was entered in a separate proceeding. When a proceeding to declare a separate judgment of conviction constitutionally invalid has been held, a determination by the court that the separate conviction is constitutional precludes any subsequent attack on constitutional grounds in a subsequent prosecution in which the same separate conviction is charged. In
 addition, any determination that a separate conviction is unconstitutional precludes any allegation or use of that separate conviction in any judicial or administrative proceeding, and the department shall strike that separate conviction from its records. Pursuant to Section 1803, the court shall report to the Department of Motor Vehicles any determination upholding a conviction on constitutional grounds and any determination that a conviction is unconstitutional.

This section shall not preclude a subsequent challenge to a conviction if, at a later time, a subsequent statute or appellate court decision having retroactive application affords any new basis to challenge the constitutionality of the conviction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------

23626.

A conviction of an offense in any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the Dominion of Canada that, if committed in this state, would be a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of this code, or Section 191.5 of, or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of, the Penal Code, is a conviction of Section 23152 or 23153 of this code, or Section 191.5 of, or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of, the Penal Code for the purposes of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 747, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Defenses [23630. - 23630.]

23630.

The fact that any person charged with driving under the influence of any drug or the combined influence of alcoholic beverages and any drug in violation of Section 23152 or 23153 is, or has been entitled to use, the drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a defense against any violation of the sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Dismissal on the Record [23635. - 23635.]

23635.

When an allegation of a violation of Section 23152 is dismissed by the court, an allegation of a different or lesser offense is substituted for an allegation of a violation of Section 23152, or an allegation of a separate conviction is dismissed or stricken, the court shall specify on the record its reason or reasons for the order. The court shall also specify on the record whether the dismissal, substitution, or striking was requested by the prosecution and whether the prosecution concurred in or
 opposed the dismissal, substitution, or striking.

When the prosecution makes a motion for a dismissal or substitution, or for the striking of a separate conviction, the prosecution shall submit a written statement which shall become part of the court record and which gives the reasons for the motion. The reasons shall include, but need not be limited to, problems of proof, the interests of justice, why another offense is more properly charged, if applicable, and any other pertinent reasons. If the reasons include the “interests of justice,” the written statement shall specify all of the factors which contributed to this conclusion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Court Restrictions [23640. - 23640.]

23640.

(a) In any case in which a person is charged with a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, prior to acquittal or conviction, the court shall neither suspend nor stay the proceedings for the purpose of allowing the accused person to attend or participate, nor shall the court consider dismissal of or entertain a motion to dismiss the proceedings because the accused person attends or participates during that suspension, in any one or more education, training, or treatment programs, including, but not limited to, a
 driver improvement program, a treatment program for persons who are habitual users of alcohol or other alcoholism program, a program designed to offer alcohol services to problem drinkers, an alcohol or drug education program, or a treatment program for persons who are habitual users of drugs or other drug-related program.

(b) This section shall not apply to any attendance or participation in any education, training, or treatment programs after conviction and sentencing, including attendance or participation in any of those programs as a condition of probation granted after conviction when permitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 22, Sec. 42.   Effective May 26, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Alcohol Assessment [23645. - 23650.]

23645.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), any person convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 shall, in addition to any other fine, assessment, or imprisonment imposed pursuant to law, pay an alcohol abuse education and prevention penalty assessment in an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) for deposit and distribution pursuant to Section 1463.25 of the Penal Code.

(b) The payment of the
 penalty assessment under this section shall be ordered upon conviction of a person of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 irrespective of any other proceeding and, if probation is granted, the payment of the penalty assessment shall also be ordered as a condition of probation, except in unusual cases that are subject to subdivision (d) of Section 1464 of the Penal Code.

(c) The court shall determine if the defendant has the ability to pay a penalty assessment. If the court determines that the defendant has the ability to pay a penalty assessment, the court may set the amount to be paid and order the defendant to pay that sum to the county in the manner in which the court believes reasonable and compatible with the defendant’s financial ability. In making a determination of whether a defendant has the ability to pay, the court shall take into account the amount of any fine imposed upon the defendant and any amount the defendant has been
 ordered to pay in restitution. If the court determines that the defendant does not have the ability to pay a penalty assessment, the defendant shall not be required to pay a penalty assessment.

(d) Five percent of the funds allocated to primary prevention programs to the school and the communities pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11802 of the Health and Safety Code shall be used to conduct an annual evaluation. The annual evaluation shall be conducted by the office of the county superintendent of schools in counties where the program is operating in a single county or in the office of the county superintendent of schools in the county designated as the lead county in counties where the program is operating as a consortium of counties. The evaluation shall contain the following:

(1) A needs assessment evaluation that provides specific data regarding the problem to be
 resolved.

(2) A written report of the planning process outlining the deliberations, considerations, and conclusions following a review of the needs assessment.

(3) An end of fiscal year accountability evaluation that will indicate the program’s continuing ability to reach appropriate program beneficiaries, deliver the appropriate benefits, and use funds appropriately.

(4) An impact evaluation charged with the task of assessing the effectiveness of the program. Guidelines for the evaluation report format and the timeliness for the submission of the report shall be developed by the State Department of Education. Each county shall submit an evaluation report annually to the State Department of Education and the State Department of Education shall write and submit a report to the Legislature and
 Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------

23646.

(a) Each county alcohol program administrator or the administrator’s designee shall develop, implement, operate, and administer an alcohol and drug problem assessment program pursuant to this article for each person described in subdivision (b). The alcohol and drug problem assessment program may include a referral and client tracking component.

(b) (1) The court shall order a person to participate in an alcohol and drug problem assessment program pursuant to this section and Sections 23647 to 23649, inclusive, and the related regulations of the State Department of Health Care Services, if the person was convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 that occurred within 10 years of a separate violation of Section 23152 or 23153 that
 resulted in a conviction.

(2) A court may order a person convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 to attend an alcohol and drug problem assessment program pursuant to this article.

(3) The court shall order a person convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 who has previously been convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 that occurred more than 10 years ago, or has been previously convicted of a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 647 of the Penal Code, to attend and complete an alcohol and drug problem assessment program under this article. In order to determine whether a previous conviction for a violation occurring more than 10 years ago exists, the court shall rely on state summary criminal history information, local summary history information, or records made available to the judge through the district attorney.

(c) The State Department of Health Care Services shall establish minimum specifications for alcohol and other drug problem assessments and reports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 485, Sec. 31.   (SB 611)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

23647.

(a) Any person convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 who is required to participate in a county alcohol and drug problem assessment program shall participate in that program.

(b) Any person convicted of a violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, in a judicial district that participates in a county alcohol and drug problem assessment program pursuant to this article, may be ordered to participate in the
 program.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 23249.53 by Stats. 1999, Ch. 22, Sec. 30.   Effective May 26, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

23648.

(a) Each county shall prepare, or contract to be prepared, an alcohol and drug problem assessment report on each person described in subdivision (b) of Section 23646.

(b) The assessment report shall include, if applicable, a recommendation for any additional treatment and the duration of the treatment. The treatment shall be in addition to the education and counseling program required under Section 11837 of the Health
 and Safety Code. The assessment report shall be submitted to the court not more than 14 days after the date the assessment was conducted.

(c) Within 30 days of the receipt of the report, the court shall order the person to complete the recommendations set forth in the report in satisfaction of, and consistent with, the terms and conditions of probation. If the court elects not to order the completion of the recommended plan, the court shall specify on the record its reason for not adopting these recommendations.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2000.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 23249.54 (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 656, Sec. 7) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 22, Sec. 32.   Effective May 26, 1999.   Renumbering action operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 22.   Section operative January 1, 2000, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23649.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in addition to any other fine or penalty assessment, there shall be levied an assessment of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) upon every fine, penalty, or forfeiture imposed and collected by the courts for a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 in any judicial district that participates in a county alcohol and drug problem assessment program. An assessment of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) shall be imposed and collected by the courts from each person convicted of a violation
 of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, who is ordered to participate in a county alcohol and drug problem assessment program pursuant to Section 23647.

(b) The court shall determine if the defendant has the ability to pay the assessment. If the court determines that the defendant has the ability to pay the assessment then the court may set the amount to be reimbursed and order the defendant to pay that sum to the county in the manner that the court determines is reasonable and compatible with the defendant’s financial ability. In making a determination of whether a defendant has the ability to pay, the court shall take into account the amount of any fine imposed upon the defendant and any amount the defendant has been ordered to pay in restitution. 

(c) Notwithstanding Section 1463 or 1464 of the Penal Code or any other provision of law, all moneys collected pursuant
 to this section shall be deposited in a special account in the county treasury and shall be used exclusively by the county alcohol program administrator or the administrator’s designee to pay for the costs of developing, implementing, operating, maintaining, and evaluating alcohol and drug problem assessment programs.

(d) On January 15 of each year, the treasurer of each county that administers an alcohol and drug problem assessment program shall determine those moneys in the special account that were not expended during the preceding fiscal year, and shall transfer those moneys to the general fund of the county. 

(e) Any moneys remaining in the special account, if and when the alcohol and drug problem assessment program is terminated, shall be transferred to the general fund of the county. 

(f) The county treasurer
 shall annually transfer an amount of money equal to the county’s administrative cost incurred pursuant to this section, as he or she shall determine, from the special account to the general fund of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1064, Sec. 13.   Effective September 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

23650.

The Office of Traffic Safety shall adopt rules and guidelines to implement Sections 23646 to 23649, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 22, Sec. 43.   Effective May 26, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Presentence Investigation [23655. - 23655.]

23655.

(a) Upon any conviction of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, any judge of the court may order a presentence investigation to determine whether a person convicted of the violation would benefit from one or more education, training, or treatment programs, and the court may order suitable education, training, or treatment for the person, in addition to imposing any penalties required by this code.

(b) In determining whether to require, as a
 condition of probation, the participation in a program pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 23538, subdivision (b) of Section 23542, subdivision (b) of Section 23548, subdivision (b) of Section 23552, subdivision (b) of Section 23556, subdivision (b) of Section 23562, or subdivision (b) of Section 23568, the court may consider any relevant information about the person made available pursuant to a presentence investigation, which is permitted but not required by subdivision (a), or other screening procedure. That information shall not be furnished to the court by any person who also provides services in a privately operated, approved program or who has any direct interest in a privately operated, approved program. In addition, the court shall obtain from the Department of Motor Vehicles a copy of the person’s driving record to determine whether the person is eligible to participate in an approved program.

(c) The Judicial Council shall adopt a
 standard form for use by all courts, defendants, and alcohol or drug education programs in certifying to the court that the person has achieved both of the following:

(1) Enrolled within the specified time period.

(2) Successfully completed any program required by Section 23538 or 23556.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 22, Sec. 44.   Effective May 26, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Surrender and Notification of License Restriction [23660. - 23662.]

23660.

(a) If a person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle is required to be suspended or revoked by the department under other provisions of this code upon the conviction of an offense described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 23152) of Chapter 12 of Division 11, that person shall surrender each and every operator’s license of that person to the court upon conviction. The court shall transmit the license or
 licenses required to be suspended or revoked to the department under Section 13550, and the court shall notify the department.

(b) This section does not apply to an administrative proceeding by the department to suspend or revoke the driving privilege of any person pursuant to other provisions of law.

(c) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 551, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Amended version operative September 20, 2005, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (c).)
-------------------------------------------

23662.

If a person is placed on probation, the court shall promptly notify the Department of Motor Vehicles of the probation and probationary term and conditions in a manner prescribed by the department. The department shall place the fact of probation and the probationary term and conditions on the person’s records in the department.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 23203 (as amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 756) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 22, Sec. 23.   Effective May 26, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Delayed Suspensions and Revocations [23665. - 23665.]

23665.

(a) If a person is convicted of a violation of Section 20001, or of Section 23152 or 23153 and is sentenced to one year in a county jail or more than one year in the state prison under Section 23540, 23542, 23546, 23548, 23550, 23550.5, 23552, 23554, 23556, 23558, 23560, 23562, 23566, or 23568, the court may postpone the revocation or suspension of the person’s driving privilege until the term of imprisonment is
 served.

(b) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 551, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Amended version operative September 20, 2005, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (b).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Conflict of Interest [23670. - 23670.]

23670.

A court shall not order or refer any person to any program, including an alcohol and other drug education program or a program licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 11836) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or to a provider of a program, in which any employee of the court has a direct or indirect economic interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Operative Date [23675. - 23675.]

23675.

This division shall become operative on July 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (July 1, 1999) for Division 11.5, commencing with Section 23500.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. EQUIPMENT OF VEHICLES [24000. - 28246.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [24000. - 24020.]

24000.

Wherever in this division the word “department” occurs, it means the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

24001.

This division and Division 13 (commencing at Section 29000), unless otherwise provided, applies to all vehicles whether publicly or privately owned when upon the highways, including all authorized emergency vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

24001.5.

A golf cart as defined in Section 345 shall only be subject to the provisions of this division which are applicable to a motorcycle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

24002.

(a) It is unlawful to operate any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in an unsafe condition, or which is not safely loaded, and which presents an immediate safety hazard.

(b) It is unlawful to operate any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is not equipped as provided in this code.

(c) A motor carrier shall not require a person to drive a commercial motor vehicle unless the driver can, by reason of experience, training, or both, determine whether the cargo being transported, including baggage in a passenger-carrying commercial vehicle, has been properly located, distributed, and secured in or on the
 commercial motor vehicle operated by the driver.

(d) A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle unless the driver can, by reason of experience, training, or both, demonstrate familiarity with the methods and procedures for securing cargo in or on the commercial motor vehicle operated by the driver.

(e) Drivers and motor carriers of commercial motor vehicles shall comply with Section 392.9 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(f) For purposes of this section, “commercial motor vehicle” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, and also includes any vehicle listed in Section 34500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 47.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

24002.5.

(a) No person may operate a farm labor vehicle that is in a condition that presents an immediate safety hazard or in violation of Section 24004 or 31402.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both that fine and a sentence of confinement for not more than six months in the county jail. No part of any fine imposed under this section may be
 suspended.

(c) As used in this section, an “immediate safety hazard” is any equipment violation described in subdivision (a) of Section 31401 or Section 31405, including any violation of a regulation adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(d) Any member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol may impound a farm labor vehicle operated in violation of this section pursuant to Section 34506.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 873, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24003.

No vehicle shall be equipped with any lamp or illuminating device not required or permitted in this code, nor shall any lamp or illuminating device be mounted inside a vehicle unless specifically permitted by this code. This section does not apply to:

(a) Interior lamps such as door, brake and instrument lamps, and map, dash, and dome lamps designed and used for the purpose of illuminating the interior of the vehicle.

(b) Lamps needed in the operation or utilization of those vehicles mentioned in Section 25801, or vehicles used by public utilities
 in the repair or maintenance of their service, or used only for the illumination of cargo space of a vehicle while loading or unloading.

(c) Warning lamps mounted inside an authorized emergency vehicle and meeting requirements established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

24004.

No person shall operate any vehicle or combination of vehicles after notice by a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1 or subdivision (a) of Section 830.2 of the Penal Code, that the vehicle is in an unsafe condition or is not equipped as required by this code, except as may be necessary to return the vehicle or combination of vehicles to the residence or place of business of the owner or driver or to a garage, until the vehicle and its equipment have been made to conform with the requirements of this code.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to an employee who does not know that such notice has been issued, and in
 such event the provisions of Section 40001 shall be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 171.)
-------------------------------------------

24005.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, offer for sale, lease, install, or replace, either for himself or as the agent or employee of another, or through such agent or employee, any glass, lighting equipment, signal devices, brakes, vacuum or pressure hose, muffler, exhaust, or any kind of equipment whatsoever for use, or with knowledge that any such equipment is intended for eventual use, in any vehicle, that is not in conformity with this code or regulations made thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 734.)
-------------------------------------------

24005.5.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale for use on loads regulated by the department any type of synthetic fiber rope or webbing strap material unless it meets requirements established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

24006.

No person shall sell or offer for sale either separately or as a part of the equipment of a new motor vehicle any equipment or device subject to requirements established by the department unless the equipment or device bears thereon the trademark or name and type or model designation under requirements established by the department and is accompanied by any printed instructions which may be required by the department as to the light source to be used with lamps, any particular methods of mounting or adjustment of lamps or other devices, and any other instructions as determined by the department necessary for compliance with this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

24007.

(a) (1) No dealer or person holding a retail seller’s permit shall sell a new or used vehicle that is not in compliance with this code and departmental regulations adopted pursuant to this code, unless the vehicle is sold to another dealer, sold for the purpose of being legally wrecked or dismantled, or sold exclusively for off-highway use.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to any vehicle sold by either (A) a dismantler after being reported for dismantling pursuant to Section 11520 or (B) a salvage pool after obtaining a salvage certificate pursuant to Section 11515 or a nonrepairable vehicle certificate issued pursuant to Section 11515.2.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the equipment requirements of this division do not apply to the sale of a leased vehicle by a dealer to a lessee if the lessee is in possession of the vehicle immediately prior to the time of the sale and the vehicle is registered in this state.

(b) (1) Except as provided in Section 24007.5, no person shall sell, or offer or deliver for sale, to the ultimate purchaser, or to any subsequent purchaser a new or used motor vehicle, as those terms are defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 39010) of Part 1 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, subject to Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of that Division 26 which is not in compliance with that part and the rules and regulations of the State Air Resources Board, unless the vehicle is sold to a dealer or sold for the purpose of being legally wrecked or dismantled.

(2) Prior to or at the time of delivery for sale, the seller shall provide the purchaser a valid certificate of compliance or certificate of noncompliance, as appropriate, issued in accordance with Section 44015 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Paragraph (2) does not apply to any vehicle whose transfer of ownership and registration is described in subdivision (d) of Section 4000.1.

(4) Paragraphs (1) and (2) do not apply to any vehicle sold by either (A) a dismantler after being reported for dismantling pursuant to Section 11520 or (B) a salvage pool after obtaining a salvage certificate pursuant to Section 11515 or a nonrepairable vehicle certificate issued pursuant to Section 11515.2.

(c) (1) With each application for initial
 registration of a new motor vehicle or transfer of registration of a motor vehicle subject to Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, a dealer, the purchaser, or their authorized representative, shall transmit to the Department of Motor Vehicles a valid certificate of compliance or noncompliance, as appropriate, issued in accordance with Section 44015 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subdivision, with respect to new vehicles certified pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 43100) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, a dealer may transmit, in lieu of a certificate of compliance, a statement, in a form and containing information deemed necessary and appropriate by the Director of Motor Vehicles and the Executive Officer of the State Air Resources Board, to attest to the vehicle’s compliance with that chapter. The statement shall be
 certified under penalty of perjury, and shall be signed by the dealer or the dealer’s authorized representative.

(3) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a transfer of ownership and registration under any of the circumstances described in subdivision (d) of Section 4000.1.

(d) A salvage vehicle rebuilder, when selling a total loss salvage vehicle, including a revived salvage loss vehicle, shall provide the purchaser with a valid vehicle safety systems certificate of compliance issued pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) of Chapter 20.3 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code prior to, or at the time of, delivery for sale, unless the vehicle is sold to a dealer or sold for the purpose of being legally wrecked or dismantled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 25.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

24007.1.
